test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_I_mitigwaab_gt-norm.yaml
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: imitigwaabenhimishiniibaning
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: imitigwaabenhimishiniibanan
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: imitigwaabenhimishiniibanag
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: imitigwaabenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: imitigwaabenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: imitigwaabenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: imitigwaabenhimishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: imitigwaabenhimishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: imitigwaabenhimishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: imitigwaabenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: imitigwaabenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: imitigwaabenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: imitigwaabensimishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: imitigwaabensimishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: imitigwaabensimishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: imitigwaabensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: imitigwaabensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: imitigwaabensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: imitigwaabensimishiniibaning
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: imitigwaabensimishiniibanan
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: imitigwaabensimishiniibanag
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: imitigwaabensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: imitigwaabensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: imitigwaabensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: imitigwaabensimishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: imitigwaabensimishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: imitigwaabensimishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: imitigwaabensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: imitigwaabensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: imitigwaabensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
